Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 2 Creation and Expansion

19-2-1.
Agreement to form financial institution.

Fifteen (15) or more persons, all of whom shall be citizens and residents of this state, who associate themselves by a written agreement to form, may, upon compliance with the provisions of this chapter, become a financial institution, with all the powers, rights, and privileges, and subject to all of the duties, restrictions, and liabilities set forth in this title and in all laws relating to financial institutions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39.

19-2-2.
Contents of agreement to form.

Any agreement to form shall state that the subscribers to the agreement associate themselves with the intention of forming a financial institution pursuant to this title to transact business authorized by this title within this state and shall specify:

The name by which the financial institution shall be known, which shall be consistent with words identified with those of financial institutions.

The purpose for which it is formed.

The address at which its business is to be transacted.

For stock-owned companies, the amount of its capital stock, which shall in no event be less than three million dollars ($3,000,000), and the number of shares into which the capital stock is to be divided.

Whether the financial institution intends to exercise trust powers.

Each agreement to form shall contain the name, residence, and post office address of each subscriber, and, for stock-owned companies, the number of shares of stock that each subscriber agrees to take.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39.

19-2-3.
Application to form financial institution — Issuance or denial of certificate.

The subscribers to the agreement to form shall make application to the director, or the director’s designee, for a certificate that public convenience and advantage will be promoted by the establishment of the financial institution, which certificate the director, or the director’s designee, is hereby authorized to grant. The decision on the certificate may be appealed pursuant to chapter 1 of title 19.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39; P.L. 2013, ch. 50, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 57, § 3.

19-2-4.
Notice of subscribers’ meeting.

The first meeting of the subscribers to the agreement to form shall be called by a notice signed either by that subscriber to the agreement to form who is designated in the agreement for this purpose, or by a majority of the subscribers. The notice shall state the time, place, and purposes of the meeting. A copy of the notice shall, at least seven (7) days before the day appointed for the meeting, be given to each subscriber or left at the subscriber’s residence, and an affidavit of a majority of the signers of the notice that the notice has been served shall be recorded with the records of the first meeting. If all the subscribers, in writing, endorsed upon the agreement to form, waive this notice and fix the time and place of meeting, no notice shall be required.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39.

19-2-5.
Proceedings at subscribers’ meeting.

At the first meeting, or at the adjournment of any meeting, the subscribers shall, without limiting other actions, choose a temporary secretary, adopt bylaws, and elect, in any manner as the bylaws may determine, directors, a president, a secretary, and any other officers as the bylaws may prescribe. All of the elected officers shall be sworn to the faithful performance of their duties. The temporary secretary shall make and attest a record of the proceedings until the secretary has been chosen and sworn, including a record of the choice and qualification.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39.

19-2-6.
Certificate of president and directors elected at first meeting.

The president and a majority of the directors who are elected at the first meeting shall make, sign, and make oath to a certificate setting forth:

A true copy of the agreement to form, the names of the subscribers to the agreement, and the name, residence, and post office address of each of the officers of the financial institution; and

The date of the first meeting.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39.

19-2-7.
Approval of certificate — Filing — Fee on capital stock.

The certificate in §

19-2-6

shall be submitted to the director, or the director’s designee, together with the records of the first meeting, and the director, or the director’s designee, shall examine the certificate and records and may require an amendment of the certificate and records or any additional information the director may consider necessary. If the director finds that the certificate and records conform to the provisions of the preceding sections relative to the organization of the financial institution; and to the provisions of this title; and that the provisions of this title have been complied with; and that public convenience and advantage will be promoted by the establishment of the financial institution, the director, or the director’s designee, shall endorse his or her approval on the certificate and shall maintain a copy of the certificate, together with the copy of the records of the first meeting. Upon approval of the certificate by the director, or the director’s designee, the certificate shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state, together with the certificate of the general treasurer that the subscribers have paid into the treasury for the use of the state a sum equal to one-tenth of one percent (.1%) of the amount of capital stock.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39.

19-2-8.
Certificate of secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall, upon the filing of certificates, as provided in §

19-2-7

, and upon the payment of ten dollars ($10.00), record the certificate and issue to the financial institution a certificate, under the seal of the state, substantially in the following form:

STATE OF RHODE ISLAND BE IT KNOWN THAT WHEREAS (the names of the subscribers to the agreement to form) have associated themselves for the purpose of forming a financial institution under the name of (the name of the financial institution), for the purpose (the purpose declared in the agreement to form), with capital stock of (if applicable, the amount fixed in the agreement to form), and have complied with the provisions of the statutes of this state in the case made and provided, as appears from the certificate of the financial institution, duly approved by the director or the director’s designee and recorded in this office: NOW, THEREFORE, I (the name of the secretary), secretary of state of the state of Rhode Island, do hereby certify that (the names of the subscribers to the agreement to form), their associates and successors, are legally organized and established as an existing financial institution, under the name of (name of the financial institution), with the powers, rights, and privileges, and subject to the liabilities, duties, and restrictions, imposed by law. WITNESS my official signature subscribed hereunto subscribed, and the seal of the state of Rhode Island hereunto affixed, this day of in the year .

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39.

19-2-9.
Payment for stock in cash — Certificate authorizing transaction of business.

The financial institution, if a stock financial institution, shall not issue any shares of stock until the par value of the shares has been actually paid in cash, free and clear of all encumbrances. When the whole capital stock has been issued, a complete list of the stockholders, with the name, residence, and post office address of each, and the number of shares held by each, shall be filed with the director, or the director’s designee, which list shall be verified under oath by two (2) of the principal officers of the financial institution.

Upon receipt of the statement in the case of stock financial institutions, the director, or the director’s designee, shall cause an examination to be made. If, after the examination, it appears that the whole capital stock has been paid in cash for stock financial institutions and that all requirements of law have been complied with, the director, or the director’s designee, shall issue a certificate authorizing this financial institution to begin transaction of business, and then the subscribers and their associates, successors, and assigns, shall be authorized to transact business as an organized financial institution, with all of the powers, rights, and privileges, and subject to the liabilities, duties, and restrictions imposed by law, and the records of the first meeting of the subscribers to the agreement to form shall become and be taken as the records of the first meeting of the financial institution. It shall be unlawful for any of these financial institutions to begin the transaction of business until this certificate has been granted.

The financial institution shall in no way be obligated, directly or indirectly, for any indebtedness related to the shareholders’ acquisition of capital stock.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39.

19-2-10.
Amendment of agreement to form.

Subject to the approval of the director, or the director’s designee, any financial institution or credit union may amend its agreement to form.

If the amendment increases the capital stock of a stock financial institution, the certificate of the general treasurer that the financial institution has paid into the treasury for the use of the state a sum equal to one tenth of one percent (.1%) of the increase shall be presented to the secretary of state; provided, however, that no share or shares of any increase of stock shall be issued by any financial institution until the par value of the stock has been actually paid in cash.

The director, or the director’s designee, may permit any stock financial institution to transfer to its capital account, from any surplus accounts that are not set aside as security for any class of depositors, an amount that will leave, after the transfer, a surplus in addition to any amount set aside as special security of at least one hundred percent (100%) of the total capital stock. The director may authorize the financial institution to issue further shares of stock for the transferred amount whenever the director, or the director’s designee, is satisfied that the entire capital stock when added to and the remaining surplus represent assets of equivalent value properly invested for banking purposes; and provided, also, that nothing in this section shall be construed to affect, in any way, any right with respect to the determination of the amount and issue of capital stock conferred upon any existing financial institution by its act of formation or any amendment or addition to its act of formation, except that no capital stock shall be issued until the par value of the stock has been actually paid in cash, and until the director, or the director’s designee, certifies this; and provided further that no amendment, change, or alteration shall contain any provision that could not lawfully be contained in an original agreement to form under this title filed at the time of applying for amendment.

Upon the issuance of the duplicate certified by the secretary of state, the agreement to form shall be amended accordingly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39; P.L. 2000, ch. 146, § 1.

19-2-11.
Establishment of branches.

Any financial institution or credit union may establish a branch, or branches, within this state at any other place than its main office upon obtaining the approval of the director, or the director’s designee. The director, or the director’s designee, shall decide, upon consideration of factors consistent with the creation of the financial institution or credit union, whether to issue a certificate of public convenience and advantage.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 2.

19-2-12.
Relocation of branches.

Any financial institution or credit union may relocate a branch upon sixty (60) days’ prior written notice to the director, or the director’s designee, provided that the relocated branch is:

To be located within the same city or town as the existing branch; or

To be located within a ten (10) mile radius of the existing branch; and

The existing branch will be closed upon construction and/or occupancy of the relocated branch.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 1, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 1, effective June 29, 2022.

19-2-13.
Merger.

Any financial institution may, subject to the approval of the director, or the director’s designee, to be given on any notice and terms that the director, or the director’s designee, may require:

Merge into, or consolidate with, another regulated institution or other insured-deposit-taking institution duly organized under the laws of the United States;

Purchase substantially all of the assets and assume substantially all of the liabilities of another regulated institution or other insured-deposit-taking institution duly organized under the laws of the United States; or

Acquire more than fifty percent (50%) of the stock of another regulated institution or other insured-deposit-taking institution duly organized under the laws of the United States.

Any of these transactions shall be undertaken pursuant to a plan that has been approved by an affirmative vote of two thirds (2/3) of the board of directors and, in the case of a mutually owned financial institution, two thirds (2/3) of the board of directors or trustees and a majority vote of the depositors of the mutually owned financial institutions present in person or by proxy, at a meeting called by the board of directors or trustees. For the purpose of this section, unless otherwise required under applicable provisions of federal banking law, the depositor shall be deemed to be the individual whose tax identification number or social security number is used by the bank for interest reporting purposes to the Internal Revenue Service.

The director, or the director’s designee, shall consider:

The fairness to the owners of the financial institutions;

The financial condition of the financial institutions; and

The public convenience and advantage.

All regulated institutions merged under this chapter shall comply with the relevant provisions of §§

7-1.2-1001

—

7-1.2-1005

.

The original of the articles of merger, bearing the approval of the director, or the director’s designee, shall be filed with the director, or the director’s designee, and duplicates shall be filed with the secretary of state, who shall, upon payment to him or her of twenty-five dollars ($25.00), issue a certificate of merger or certificate of consolidation pursuant to §

7-1.2-1003

. Upon the issuance of the certificate or upon a later date, not more than thirty (30) days after the filing of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation, as may be set forth in the articles, the merger or consolidation shall be effected pursuant to §

7-1.2-1005

. Any shareholder of a financial institution who or that is a party to a plan requiring approval under this section, shall have the right to dissent from the action involved in accordance with §

7-1.2-1201

, and any shareholder who or that elects to exercise that right in compliance with §

7-1.2-1202

, shall be entitled to the rights of dissenting shareholders on the terms and conditions set forth in §

7-1.2-1202

. References to “articles of incorporation” in chapter 1.2 of title 7 shall be deemed to refer to the “Agreement to Form” of the financial institution involved.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 15; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 15.

19-2-14.
Conversion to stock form of financial institution.

Any mutual savings bank chartered under the laws of this state may convert to and become a financial institution with capital stock upon adoption of a plan of conversion by two-thirds (2/3) vote of the board of trustees and approval of the plan by the director, or the director’s designee, and a majority vote of the depositors of the savings bank present in person or by proxy at a meeting called by the board of trustees. For the purpose of this section, unless otherwise required under applicable provisions of federal banking law, the depositor shall be deemed to be the individual whose tax identification number or social security number is used by the bank for interest reporting purposes to the Internal Revenue Service. The plan of conversion shall provide that the savings bank shall issue and sell the stock issued in connection with the conversion at a price that represents its pro forma market value, as determined by an independent appraisal, and shall offer its stock initially in a subscription offering to the depositors of the savings bank on an eligibility record date established by the board of trustees, giving those depositors priority rights to purchase the shares over the general public pro rata based on deposits. The converted savings bank shall also create a liquidation account for the benefit of its depositors on the eligibility record date, in an amount representing the undivided profits and guaranty fund of the savings bank at that time, balances of which shall be calculated and subsequently recalculated as determined in accordance with regulations promulgated by the director, or the director’s designee. Unless otherwise impaired, any liquidation account so created also shall be considered as part of the paid-in and unimpaired capital stock and surplus of any stock financial institution. The plan of conversion may provide for restrictions on the amount of stock that any person or entity may purchase in the conversion, or own or control thereafter, which may also be incorporated into the stock agreement to form the converted entity.

In connection with the conversion, the financial institution may form a holding company or utilize an existing holding company to hold all the shares of the financial institution, and offer to its depositors and general public (subject to subscription rights in favor of depositors) all of the stock of the holding company in lieu of the capital stock of the financial institution. This conversion may also be accomplished pursuant to a merger as permitted by this title. The converting savings bank may, at the time of conversion, merge any financial institution subsidiary into the capital stock financial institution resulting from the conversion, or cause the subsidiary to become a separate subsidiary of a holding company.

No savings bank may convert to a stock form of financial institution unless its deposits will continue to be federally insured. The corporate existence of a mutual savings bank converting to the stock financial institution shall not terminate, but the financial institution shall be deemed to be a continuation of entity of the savings bank so converted.

In connection with its approval of the plan of conversion, the director, or the director’s designee, shall approve the proposed stock agreement to form the converted entity. The director, or the director’s designee, upon finding that the requirements of this section and applicable regulations have been met, and that the conversion has been completed with the sale of all shares offered in the conversion, shall issue a certificate of approval of the conversion to the converted entity. Upon the payment of fifty dollars ($50.00), the certificate of approval shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state, together with the certificate of the general treasurer that the converted entity has paid into the treasury for the use of the state a sum equal to one tenth of one percent (.1%) of its capital stock which, in no event, shall be less than one hundred dollars ($100). Upon the filing of the certificate with the secretary of state and payment of fifty dollars ($50.00), the secretary of state shall immediately record the certificate of approval and stock agreement to form, whereupon the stock agreement to form will become effective.

The director, or the director’s designee, shall issue rules and regulations implementing this section.

To the extent not inconsistent with this section, each mutual savings bank converted into a stock financial institution shall have all the powers and privileges conferred on, and be subject to all the duties and liabilities imposed on, financial institutions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39; P.L. 1998, ch. 441, § 12.

19-2-14.1.
Mutual holding companies.

Any mutual savings bank chartered under the laws of this state may reorganize into the mutual holding company form of organization pursuant to this section. A mutual savings bank may reorganize into a mutual holding company form of organization by organizing a mutual holding company and chartering one or more interim stock financial institutions or corporate subsidiaries and merging with those banks or subsidiaries, or in any other manner approved by the director. The method of organizing the mutual holding company shall be set forth in a plan of mutual holding company reorganization. The corporate existence of a mutual savings bank converting to a stock financial institution as part of the reorganizing into the mutual holding company structure shall not terminate, but the stock financial institution, referred to in this section as the continuing stock financial institution, shall be deemed to be a continuation of the reorganizing mutual savings bank. The mutual holding company must at all times own, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediate stock holding companies, a majority of the voting shares of capital stock of the continuing stock financial institution. A mutual holding company organized under this section also may include an intermediate stock holding company so long as the mutual holding company owns a majority of the voting shares of capital stock of the intermediate stock holding company.

The plan of mutual holding company reorganization must be approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the board of trustees and by the director, or the director’s designee. In connection with its approval of the plan of mutual holding company reorganization, the director, or the director’s designee, shall approve the proposed agreement to form and the proposed bylaws of the mutual holding company. The approval of the plan of mutual holding company reorganization by a majority vote of the depositors of the mutual savings bank present in person or by proxy at a meeting called by the board of trustees is also required. For the purpose of this section, unless otherwise required under applicable provisions of federal banking law, the depositor shall be deemed to be the individual whose tax identification number or social security number is used by the bank for interest reporting purposes to the Internal Revenue Service.

To the extent not inconsistent with this section, the continuing stock financial institution subsidiary of the mutual holding company shall have all the powers and privileges conferred on, and be subject to all the duties and liabilities imposed on, financial institutions.

If shares of common stock are offered for sale by the continuing stock financial institution subsidiary of the mutual holding company, or by an intermediate stock holding company subsidiary of the mutual holding company, to the general public for a price payable in cash, depositors shall be given subscription rights, and the offering shall be conducted in the manner provided in §

19-2-14

, and in any regulations issued by the director, or the director’s designee, under that section.

A mutual holding company and any intermediate stock holding company subsidiary may engage in any activity permitted to bank holding companies and financial holding companies under the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, 12 U.S.C. § 1841 et seq., or to savings and loan and mutual holding companies under the Home Owners’ Loan Act, 12 U.S.C. § 1467a, or in any other activity authorized by the director, or the director’s designee. Without limitation, a mutual holding company, and any intermediate stock holding company subsidiary, may, subject to other applicable provisions of title 19 governing mergers and consolidations and, with the approval of the director, or the director’s designee: (1) Merge with or consolidate with another bank, financial services, or savings and loan holding company, including a mutual holding company; or (2) Acquire or consolidate with another financial institution, whether in mutual or stock form. Any merger or consolidation may occur concurrently with a mutual holding company reorganization under this section, or subsequent to the initial reorganization, and cash and/or stock may be used as consideration for the merger or consolidation as long as the mutual holding company directly or indirectly owns a majority of the voting shares of capital stock of the intermediate stock holding company or stock financial institution after the merger or consolidation.

A mutual holding company may convert to stock form upon a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the board of trustees and the approval of the plan of conversion by the director, or the director’s designee. The conversion shall be conducted in accordance with the applicable provisions of §

19-2-14

, including the requirement to obtain depositor approval, and any regulations issued under §

19-2-14

by the director, or the director’s designee. In the case of the conversion of an existing mutual holding company to stock form, where shares of common stock of an intermediate stock holding company or stock financial institution subsidiary of the mutual holding company have previously been issued to persons other than the mutual holding company, referred to in this section as the minority stockholders, the plan of conversion shall provide that such minority stockholders shall receive an ownership interest in the resulting stock holding company equal to their percentage ownership in the intermediate stock holding company or stock financial institution subsidiary of the mutual holding company immediately prior to the conversion, which percentage ownership interest shall be adjusted taking into account the assets held by the mutual holding company, as reflected in the statement of financial condition of the mutual holding company immediately prior to the conversion, with the balance of the shares sold in accordance with § 19-2-14 and any regulations issued under that section. The adjustment, which shall be described in the plan of mutual holding company conversion submitted for approval by the director, or the director’s designee, shall be subject to the approval of the director, or the director’s designee.

The director, or the director’s designee, may issue rules and regulations implementing this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 399, § 1.

19-2-15.
Approval of amendments to bylaws required.

The bylaws of any financial institution shall not be altered, amended, or added to except upon approval of the director, or the director’s designee. A certified copy of the proposed alteration, amendment, or addition shall be submitted to the director, or the director’s designee, who shall endorse his or her approval or disapproval, and shall maintain a copy of the approval or disapproval.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39.

19-2-16.
Indemnification of officers and employees for acts in course of duties.

Any financial institution or credit union may, by bylaw, authorize its directors or trustees to indemnify and reimburse any person (or the personal representative of any person) who at any time serves, or shall have served, as director, trustee, officer, or employee of the financial institution or credit union, whether or not in office at the time, against and for any and all claims and liabilities to which he or she may be or become subject by reason of this service, and against and for any and all expenses necessarily incurred in connection with the defense or reasonable settlement of any legal or administrative proceedings to which he or she is made a party by reason of this service, except in relation to matters as to which he or she shall be finally adjudged to be liable for negligence or misconduct in the performance of his or her official duties. The provisions of this section shall not be deemed to exclude any other right or privileges to which this person may be entitled.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39.

19-2-17.
Oath of director.

Every director of a financial institution, when appointed or elected, shall take an oath that he or she will, so far as the duty devolves on him or her, diligently and honestly administer the affairs of the financial institution, and will not knowingly violate, or willingly permit to be violated, any of the provisions of this title. This oath, subscribed to by the director making it, and certified by the officer before whom it is taken, shall be immediately transmitted to the director, or the director’s designee, and shall be filed and preserved in his or her office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39.

19-2-18.
Record of meetings of boards and committees.

Every financial institution and credit union in this state shall cause a record to be made, in a book kept for that purpose, of all of the proceedings of the board of directors or trustees or standing committees thereof, at every meeting thereof, and of the names of all directors or trustees or members of committees present at any such meeting.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39.

19-2-19.
Bonds of officers and employees — Supervision by director.

Every officer and employee of a regulated institution shall be bonded in a form and in an amount that the director, or the director’s designee, may prescribe, for the honest discharge of his or her duties, and shall file with the director, or the director’s designee, an attested copy. The director, or the director’s designee, shall promulgate regulations to set minimum amounts of fidelity bond coverage based upon the size of regulated institutions, stating the minimum amount and type of coverage. The director, or the director’s designee, shall be notified of any change in the bond, or any revocation of the bond, within ten (10) business days of the change or revocation by the company issuing the bond and the responsible officer of the regulated institution as designated by the trustees or board of directors of the regulated institution.

The bond or bonds shall be continuous and remain in full force and effect until termination by either the regulated institution or the surety. Termination shall not become effective until thirty (30) days after the director, or the director’s designee, has received notice. Regardless of the number of years, the bond shall continue in force, and the limit of the surety’s liability stated in the bond shall not be cumulative from year to year or period to period.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39.

19-2-20.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 39.